New Jersey, session 222, A2028.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A school district that receives preschool education aid pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54) shall ensure that no less than 50 percent of preschool pupil placements are provided at licensed child care provider programs.  The remaining preschool pupil placements shall be provided in district programs and Head Start programs. b.    Upon application, a school district may be granted a waiver by the Department of Education of the requirements of subsection a. of this section if sufficient preschool pupil placements are not available at licensed child care provider programs within the school district.  A school district that requests a waiver shall provide such information as the Department of Education specifies to justify the request. 2.    This act shall take effect in the first full school year following the date of enactment.